Alaska, session 34, HB128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 41.21.122 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 41.21.122. Management responsibility. Except as provided by (b) and 05 (c) of this section, control, development, and maintenance of [THE] state land and 06 water described in AS 41.21.121 as the Chugach State Park and control of roadside 07 structures within the park is assigned to the department [FOR CONTROL, 08 DEVELOPMENT AND MAINTENANCE, EXCEPT THAT THE DEPARTMENT 09 OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE 10 REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE OF ALL EXISTING PUBLIC ROADS WITHIN 11 THE PARK. THE CONTROL OF HIGHWAY ACCESS AND ROADSIDE 12 STRUCTURES WITHIN THE CHUGACH STATE PARK IS THE 13 RESPONSIBILITY OF THE DEPARTMENT]. The Department of Fish and Game 14 shall cooperate with the department to provide for those purposes under AS 41.21.121 15 relevant to the duties of the Department of Fish and Game. If, in the exercise of 01 management responsibility under this section, conflicts of land ownership, 02 jurisdiction, or authority are unreconcilable or unmanageable other than at an 03 unreasonable cost and expense to the state, the commissioner, after public hearing in 04 accordance with AS 44.62, may modify, subject to the approval of the legislature, the 05 boundaries of the Chugach State Park, not to exceed 20 percent of the total acreage 06 described in AS 41.21.121. 07 * Sec. 2. AS 41.21.122 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 08 (b) The department may grant an easement or right-of-way within the 09 Chugach State Park for the purposes of repairing, maintaining, and constructing roads 10 and related facilities within the park to a municipality if 11 (1) the easement or right-of-way is requested by the municipality; 12 (2) the municipality bears any costs associated with the granted 13 easement or right-of-way and facilities related to the easement or right-of-way; 14 (3) the municipality assumes the duty of maintaining the easement or 15 right-of-way and any related constructed facilities for the duration of the grant; 16 (4) the easement or right-of-way sets out the period of its duration, 17 whether temporary or perpetual; 18 (5) the department provides notice of the proposed grant in the manner 19 provided by AS 44.62.190 and 44.62.200 and conducts at least one hearing in 20 accordance with the provisions of AS 44.62.210; and 21 (6) the commissioner finds that granting the easement or right-of-way 22 (A) will improve, facilitate, or maintain public access to the 23 park; and 24 (B) is in the public interest. 25 (c) The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall repair and 26 maintain existing public roads within the Chugach State Park except for repairs and 27 maintenance performed by a municipality under (b) of this section. 28 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.